Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB825.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 369.130 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 369.130 to 369.139:
(1) "Blockchain" means data that is:
(a) Shared across a peer-to-peer network to create a ledger of verified
transactions or information among linked network participants using
cryptography to:
1. Maintain the integrity of the ledger; or
2. Execute other functions; and
(b) Distributed in a concurrent, automated update to network participants on the
state of the ledger and any other functions;
(2) "Blockchain network" means a technical infrastructure that provides ledger and
smart contract services to applications;
(3) "Blockchain protocol" means any executable software:
(a) Deployed to a blockchain, including an additional standardized set of rules
that:
1. Uses an existing blockchain as a base;
2. Facilitates the transfer of data and electronic records;
3. Allows that data to be broadcast to nodes; and
4. Is governed by a set of predefined rules which execute autonomously
without human intervention and can be altered by a predetermined
mechanism; and
(b) Composed of a source code that is publicly available and accessible, including
a smart contract or any network of smart contracts;
(4) "Cryptocurrency" has the same meaning as in KRS 139.516;
(5) "Cryptography" means the practice of coding information to ensure only the person
Page 1 of 4
XXXX 3/2/2026 4:17 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2468
that a message was written for can read and process that information;
(6) "Digital asset" means:
(a) Virtual currency;
(b) Cryptocurrency; and
(c) Natively electronic assets, including stablecoins, fungible tokens, and
nonfungible tokens;
that confer economic, proprietary, or access rights or powers;
(7) "Hardware wallet" means a physical device that:
(a) Stores private keys offline;
(b) Provides a way to sign transactions and interact with the blockchain; and
(c) Allows the owner to retain independent control over the digital asset
contained therein;
(8) "Natively electronic asset" means a purely digital asset that exists only on the
blockchain network;
(9) "Node" means a computer which:
(a) Uses software to:
1. Communicate with other devices or participants on a blockchain to
maintain consensus and integrity of that blockchain;
2. Create and validate transaction blocks; or
3. Contain and update a copy of a blockchain; and
(b) Does not exercise discretion over transactions initiated by the end users of the
blockchain protocol;
(10) "Nonfungible token" means a digital asset on a blockchain that:
(a) Has unique identification codes and metadata that are recorded;
(b) Has been tokenized and cannot be replicated;
(c) Is used to certify ownership and authenticity; and
(d) Represents digital or physical items including artwork or real estate;
Page 2 of 4
XXXX 3/2/2026 4:17 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2468
(11) "Private key" means the access to manage digital assets at a specific internet
address and may be used for encryption and digital signature;
(12) "Self-hosted wallet" means a digital interface that can:
(a) Secure and transfer digital assets; and
(b) Allow its owner to retain independent control of the secured digital assets and
private keys;
(13) "Smart contract" has the same meaning as in KRS 42.747;
(14) "Stablecoin" means a digital asset that is:
(a) Issued by a corporation;
(b) Backed by cash or high-quality liquid assets; and
(c) Redeemable on demand by the holder at par for a fixed monetary value in
equivalent United States dollars;
(15) "Staking" means using a node to commit digital assets to a blockchain network to:
(a) Validate transactions;
(b) Propose and attest to blocks contained in the blockchain; and
(c) Secure the network;
(16) (a) "Staking as a service" means the provision of technical staking services by a
service provider on behalf of an individual or business that owns the digital
assets being staked.
(b) "Staking as a service" includes the operation of nodes and the associated
infrastructure necessary to facilitate participation in blockchain protocols'
consensus mechanisms;
(17) "Third-party wallet" means a wallet that:
(a) Is hosted and controlled by a party other than the owner; and[ which]
(b) Contains the private keys for the owner of digital assets; and
(18) "Wallet" means a digital interface or a physical device that[which] holds digital
assets or private keys, and may include a:
Page 3 of 4
XXXX 3/2/2026 4:17 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2468
(a) Hardware wallet;
(b) Self-hosted wallet; and
(c) Third-party wallet.
Page 4 of 4
XXXX 3/2/2026 4:17 PM Jacketed